pt-PT: Posição da rede de carga: Atrás dos bancos traseiros (barreira de carga); Piso de carga; Encosto do banco/parede traseira; Parede lateral; Compartimento do pneu sobresselente; Área de carga superior; Outra
fi: Tavaraverkon sijainti: Takaistuinten takana (tavaraverkko); Tavaratilan lattia; Istuimen selkänoja / takaseinä; Sivuseinä; Vararengaskotelo; Tavaratilan yläosa; Muu
pl: Położenie siatki transportowej: Za tylnymi siedzeniami (przegroda ładunkowa); Podłoga bagażnika; Oparcie fotela/tylna ściana; Ściana boczna; Wnęka koła zapasowego; Górna część przestrzeni bagażowej; Inne
it: Posizione della rete di carico: Dietro i sedili posteriori (barriera di carico); Pianale di carico; Schienale del sedile/parete posteriore; Parete laterale; Vano ruota di scorta; Area di carico superiore; Altro
fr: Position du filet de chargement: Derrière les sièges arrière (barrière de chargement); Plancher de l’espace de chargement; Dossier de siège/paroi arrière; Paroi latérale; Compartiment de la roue de secours; Espace de chargement supérieur; Autre
pt-BR: Posição da rede de carga: Atrás dos bancos traseiros (barreira de carga); Piso de carga; Encosto do banco/parede traseira; Parede lateral; Alojamento do estepe; Área de carga superior; Outro
zh-TW: 捆貨網位置: 後座後方 (貨物格柵); 行李廂底板; 座椅椅背/後牆; 側牆; 備胎艙; 行李廂上方; 其他
ru: Расположение багажной сетки: За задними сиденьями (разделительная сетка багажника); Пол багажника; Спинка сиденья/задняя стенка; Боковая стенка; Ниша для запасного колеса; Верхняя багажная зона; Другое
th: ตำแหน่งตาข่ายบรรทุกสินค้า: หลังเบาะหลัง (ที่กั้นสัมภาระ); พื้นเก็บสัมภาระ; พนักพิง/ผนังด้านหลัง; ผนังด้านข้าง; ช่องเก็บยางอะไหล่; พื้นที่เก็บสัมภาระส่วนบน; อื่นๆ
de: Position des Laderaumnetzes: Hinter den Rücksitzen (Gepäcknetz); Ladeboden; Sitzlehne/Rückwand; Seitenwand; Reserveradmulde; Oberer Laderaum; Sonstige
bg-BG: Позиция на товарната мрежа: Зад задните седалки (товарна преграда); Под на багажника; Гръб на седалка/задна стена; Странична стена; Място за резервна гума; Горна част на багажника; Друго
ko: 화물망 위치: 뒷좌석 뒤(카고 베리어); 화물 적재함 바닥; 좌석 등받이/뒷벽; 측면 벽; 스페어 타이어 웰; 상단 화물 공간; 기타
sl-SI: Položaj tovorne mreže: Za zadnjimi sedeži (pregrada za tovor); Dno prtljažnika; Naslonjalo sedeža/zadnja stena; Stranska stena; Prostor za rezervno kolo; Zgornji prostor za tovor; Drugo
nl: Laadnet positie: Achter achterbank (bagagerek); Laadvloer; Rugleuning/achterwand; Zijwand; Reservewielbak; Bovenste laadruimte; Overige
el: Καθαρή θέση φορτίου: Πίσω από τα πίσω καθίσματα (διαχωριστικό φορτίου); Δάπεδο χώρου αποσκευών; Πλάτη καθίσματος/πίσω τοίχωμα; Πλευρικό τοίχωμα; Υποδοχή ρεζέρβας; Επάνω τμήμα χώρου αποσκευών; Άλλο
nb: Lastnettposisjon: Bak baksetene (lastebarriere); Bagasjeromsgulv; Seterygg/bakvegg; Sidevegg; Brønn for reservehjul; Øvre bagasjerom; Annet
da: Placering af lastnet: Bag bagsæder (lastadskillelse); Lastgulv; Ryglæn/bagvæg; Sidevæg; Reservehjulsbrønd; Øvre lastområde; Andet
hr-HR: Položaj mreže za teret: Iza stražnjih sjedala (pregrada za teret); Pod prtljažnika; Naslon sjedala / stražnji zid; Bočni zid; Spremište za rezervnu gumu; Gornji prostor za teret; Ostalo
hu: Raktérháló helye: Hátsó ülések mögött (csomagtérelválasztó); Csomagtérpadló; Üléstámla/hátfal; Oldalfal; Pótkerék-mélyedés; Felső csomagtér; Egyéb
ro-RO: Poziția plasei de marfă: În spatele scaunelor din spate (barieră portbagaj); Podea portbagaj; Spătar scaun/perete spate; Perete lateral; Compartiment roată de rezervă; Zona superioară a portbagajului; Altele
es: Posición de la red de carga: Detrás de los asientos traseros (barrera de carga); Suelo de carga; Respaldo del asiento/pared trasera; Pared lateral; Hueco de la rueda de repuesto; Área de carga superior; Otro
sk-SK: Poloha siete na batožinu: Za zadnými sedadlami (nákladná bariéra); Podlaha batožinového priestoru; Operadlo/zadná stena; Bočná stena; Priestor na rezervné koleso; Horný batožinový priestor; Iná
vi: Vị trí lưới chở hàng: Phía sau ghế sau (vách ngăn hành lý); Sàn hành lý; Lưng ghế/tường sau; Tường bên; Khoang lốp dự phòng; Khu vực hành lý phía trên; Khác
lt-LT: Krovinio tinklo padėtis: Už galinių sėdynių (krovinių atitvaras); Krovinių skyriaus grindys; Sėdynės atlošas / galinė sienelė; Šoninė sienelė; Atsarginio rato niša; Viršutinė krovinių skyriaus dalis; Kita
en: Cargo net position: Behind rear seats (cargo barrier); Cargo floor; Seatback/back wall; Side wall; Spare tire well; Upper cargo area; Other
tr: Yük ağı konumu: Arka koltukların arkası (bagaj bariyeri); Bagaj zemini; Koltuk arkası/arka duvar; Yan duvar; Stepne yuvası; Üst bagaj alanı; Diğer
sv: Lastnätets position: Bakom baksäten (lastnät); Lastgolv; Ryggstöd/bakvägg; Sidovägg; Reservhjulsbalja; Övre lastutrymme; Annat
cs: Poloha nákladové sítě: Za zadními sedadly (dělicí síť); Podlaha zavazadlového prostoru; Opěradlo / zadní stěna; Boční stěna; Prostor pro rezervní kolo; Horní část zavazadlového prostoru; Jiné
zh-CN: 后备箱网兜安装位置: 后座后方（货物隔离网）; 行李箱地板; 座椅靠背/后壁; 侧壁; 备胎槽; 上方载货区; 其他
ja: 荷台ネットポジション: リアシート後方 (カーゴバリア); カーゴフロア; シートバック/バックウォール; サイドウォール; スペアタイヤウェル; アッパーカーゴエリア; その他